Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.110

Photographs.

All photographs of candidates submitted for publication must conform to standards established by the secretary of state by rule. No photograph may reveal clothing or insignia suggesting the holding of a public office.

[ 2003 c 111 s 811. Prior: 1999 c 260 s 10. Formerly RCW 29.81.300.]